Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Subchapter 6. Sale of Personal Property on Attachment

§ 3401.
Sale by consent of parties.

When goods or chattels are attached on mesne process in one or more actions and the debtor and attaching creditors consent in writing to a sale thereof, the attaching officer shall sell the same in the manner prescribed by law for selling like property on execution.
The proceeds of the sale, after deducting the necessary charges thereof, shall be paid into court and held to respond to judgments in such actions.

§ 3402.
Attachment after advertisement.

After the property is advertised for sale, a creditor shall not have a right to prevent such sale by attachment of the same.
The property may be charged by attachment or execution put into the hands of the officer holding it, as if the same were not advertised for sale, and the proceeds thereof shall be held subject to the attachments and executions in the officer’s hands, at the time of the sale, against the owner of the property.

§ 3403.
Perishable property—Notice of sale; appraisers.

When an attachment is made of living animals or of perishable goods or chattels which are liable to waste or liable to deteriorate appreciably in value by keeping or which cannot be kept without great or disproportionate expense, and the parties do not consent to the sale thereof, upon written application of either of the parties interested therein, made to the attaching officer, the property so attached shall be examined, appraised and sold, or otherwise disposed of and notice thereof given by the officer to the other parties in such manner as the Supreme Court shall by rule provide for service of summons.

Such officer shall prepare a schedule of the property and appoint three disinterested persons acquainted with its value as appraisers to be sworn by him or her. If such appraisers are satisfied that the defendant in the action has been informed of the attachment of the property, they shall appraise the same as provided by law.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 94, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 3404.
Duties of appraisers; sale.

The appraisers shall examine the attached property and, if the same or part thereof is liable to perish or waste or to be greatly reduced in value by keeping or cannot be kept without great and disproportionate expense, they shall appraise the same at its value in money.
Such property shall thereupon be sold by the officer and the proceeds held and disposed of as hereinbefore provided in case of a sale by consent of parties, unless the property is taken by the defendant as hereinafter provided.

§ 3405.
Return of sale.

When an attaching officer sells property pursuant to any of the preceding sections, within 30 days, he or she shall make a return of his or her sale and any action taken on the writ upon which the attachment was made and return the writ with his or her proceedings to the clerk who signed it or to the clerk of the court in which the action is pending.
When the defendant confesses judgment to the plaintiff before he or she makes the return, the officer shall make return to the magistrate before whom the judgment is confessed.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 95, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 3406.
Delivery of property to defendant on giving security.

The property appraised and ordered sold under the provisions of this subchapter shall be delivered to the defendant, if he or she requires it, upon his or her depositing with the attaching officer the appraised value thereof in money, or giving to him or her satisfactory security for payment of such value, or to satisfy such judgments as are recovered in the actions in which the property is attached, if demanded within the time during which it would have been held by the respective attachments, and to indemnify the officer for such costs and damages as he or she may sustain if such payment is not made within the time aforesaid.

§ 3407.
Officer to account for appraised value.

Such officer shall be accountable to the attaching creditor for the appraised value only of the property so delivered to the debtor.

§ 3408.
Sale after return of process.

After the process has been entered in court and before final judgment, personal property attached on mesne process may be sold or disposed of upon the same requests and in the same manner as provided for the sale or disposal of property so attached, before the process has been entered in court.

§ 3409.
Officer’s return.

When an officer sells property as provided in section 3408 of this title, he or she shall forthwith make return of his or her doings and sale to the clerk of the court or to the magistrate before whom the cause is pending.
Such return shall be appended to and made part of the officer’s return on the original process.

§ 3410.
Deposit or investment of proceeds.

When property is sold on mesne process returnable to the Superior Court under this subchapter, upon application of either party, the money realized from the sales shall be paid into court, and the clerk thereof shall invest or deposit such money during the pendency of the cause, as the court directs. When the officer has paid the money into court, he or she shall not be responsible to either party therefor.

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974.